Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2119
Board of directors; water or natural gas; powers over supplier.

In case any portion of the metropolitan utilities district is supplied with natural gas or water for domestic, mechanical, public, or fire purposes by any individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, then the board shall have the power and authority to fix rates and regulate the conditions of service and the conduct of the utility affording such supply.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 7, p. 353;

R.S.1913, § 4249;

C.S.1922, § 3752;

C.S.1929, § 14-1008;

R.S.1943, § 14-1011;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1011;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 130.

Section not applicable to defendant supplying steam and chilled water for purposes of heating and air conditioning. Dunmar Inv. Co. v. Northern Nat. Gas Co., 185 Neb. 400, 176 N.W.2d 4 (1970).